th: วัตถุประสงค์ด้านเสียง: เครื่องเสียงรถยนต์; เครื่องเสียงคอมพิวเตอร์; เครื่องเสียงภายในบ้าน; โฮมเธียเตอร์; การใช้งานนอกอาคาร; ระบบ PA; เครื่องเสียงแบบพกพา; เครื่องเสียงระดับมืออาชีพ; บ้านอัจฉริยะ; ใช้ลำโพงมอนิเตอร์; อื่นๆ
pl: Cel audio: Samochodowy sprzęt audio; Komputerowy system audio; Domowy sprzęt audio; Kino domowe; Do zastosowań na zewnątrz budynków; System PA; Przenośny sprzęt audio; Profesjonalny sprzęt audio; Inteligentny dom; Monitoring studyjny; Inne
zh-CN: 音频用途: 车载音响; 计算机音响; 家庭音响; 家庭影院; 户外使用; 广播系统; 便携音响; 专业音响; 智能家居; 演播室监测; 其他
it: Utilizzo dell'audio: Audio macchina; Audio computer; Audio domestico; Home cinema; Per uso esterno; Sistema PA; Audio portatile; Audio professionale; Smart home; Monitoraggio in studio; Altro
hr-HR: Audio namjena: Automobilski audiouređaj; Računalni audiouređaj; Kućni audiouređaj; Kućno kino; Upotreba na otvorenom; PA sustav; Prijenosni audiouređaj; Profesionalni audiouređaj; Pametni dom; Studijsko praćenje; Ostalo
el: Σκοπός ήχου: Ήχος αυτοκινήτου; Ήχος υπολογιστή; Οικιακός ήχος; Οικιακός κινηματογράφος; Εξωτερική χρήση; Μεγαφωνικό σύστημα; Φορητός ήχος; Επαγγελματικός ήχος; Έξυπνο σπίτι; Παρακολούθηση για στούντιο; Άλλο
nb: Lydformål: Bilstereo; Datamaskinlyd; Hjemmelyd; Hjemmekino; Utendørsbruk; PA-system; Bærbar lyd; Profesjonell lyd; Smarthjem; Studioovervåking; Annet
sv: Ljudändamål: Billjud; Datorljud; Hemljud; Hemmabio; Utomhusbruk; PA-system; Bärbart ljud; Professionellt ljud; Smart hem; Studioövervakning; Övrigt
ja: オーディオの用途: カーオーディオ; コンピューターオーディオ; ホームオーディオ; ホームシネマ; 屋外用; PAシステム; ポータブルオーディオ; プロ用オーディオ; スマートホーム; スタジオモニタリング; その他
fr: Objectif audio: Audio de voiture; Audio de l’ordinateur; Audio domestique; Home cinéma; Utilisation en extérieur; Système PA; Audio portable; Audio professionnel; Maison intelligente; Surveillance du sommeil; Autre
pt-PT: Finalidade do áudio: Áudio de carro; Áudio de computador; Áudio de casa; Cinema em casa; Uso exterior; Sistema de som; Áudio portátil; Áudio profissional; Casa inteligente; Monitorização de estúdio; Outro
en: Audio purpose: Car audio; Computer audio; Home audio; Home cinema; Outdoor use; PA system; Portable audio; Professional audio; Smart home; Studio monitoring; Other
zh-TW: 音訊用途: 汽車音響; 電腦喇叭; 家庭音響; 家庭劇院; 戶外使用; 擴音系統; 便攜式音響; 專業音響; 智慧型家庭; 監聽喇叭; 其他
tr: Sesin Amacı: Araç ses sistemi; Bilgisayar ses sistemi; Ev ses sistemi; Ev sineması; Dış mekanda kullanım; PA sistemi; Taşınabilir ses sistemi; Profesyonel ses sistemi; Akıllı ev; Stüdyo izleme; Diğer
sl-SI: Namen zvočne naprave: Avto; Računalnik; Doma; Domači kino; Uporaba na prostem; PA sistem; Prenosni; Profesionalni; Pametni dom; Spremljanje studia; Drugo
ru: Сфера применения аудиоустройства: Автомобильная аудиосистема; Компьютерная аудиосистема; Домашняя аудиосистема; Домашний кинотеатр; Эксплуатация на открытом воздухе; Система громкой связи; Портативная аудиосистема; Профессиональная аудиосистема; Умный дом; Студийный мониторинг; Другое
sk-SK: Účel zvukového prehrávania: Audio do auta; Počítačový zvuk; Domáce audio; Domáce kino; Vonkajšie použitie; Verejný rozhlas; Prenosný audiosystém; Profesionálny zvuk; Inteligentná domácnosť; Štúdiový monitoring; Iné
lt-LT: Garso paskirtis: Automobilio garso įranga; Kompiuterio garso įranga; Namų garso įranga; Namų kinas; Naudojama lauke; PA įranga; Nešiojamoji garso įranga; Profesionali garso įranga; Išmaniųjų namų sistema; Studijinės garso kolonėlės; Kita
bg-BG: Цел на аудиото: Автомобилно аудио; Компютърно аудио; Домашно аудио; Домашно кино; Използване на открито; PA система; Преносимо аудио; Професионално аудио; Интелигентен дом; Студиен мониторинг; Други
ro-RO: Destinație de utilizare a dispozitivelor audio: Sistem audio mașină; Sistem audio computer; Sistem audio locuință; Home cinema; Utilizare de exterior; Sistem PA; Sistem audio portabil; Sistem audio profesional; Smart home; Monitorizare de studio; Altele
pt-BR: Finalidade do áudio: Áudio de veículos; Áudio de computador; Áudio doméstico; Cinema em casa; Uso externo; Sistema PA; Áudio portátil; Áudio profissional; Smart home; Monitoramento de estúdio; Outro
fi: Audion tarkoitus: Auton audio; Tietokoneen audio; Kotiaudio; Kotiteatteri; Ulkokäyttöön; Julkinen tiedotusjärjestelmä; Kannettava audiolaite; Ammattilaistasoinen audiolaite; Älykoti; Studion seuranta; Muu
nl: Audiodoel: Auto-audio; Computeraudio; Thuisaudio; Thuisbioscoop; Gebruik buitenshuis; PA-systeem; Draagbare audio; Professionele audio; Slimme woning; Studiobewaking; Andere
ko: 오디오 용도: 카 오디오; 컴퓨터 오디오; 홈 오디오; 홈 시네마; 실외 사용; PA 시스템; 휴대용 오디오; 프로페셔널 오디오; 스마트 홈; 스튜디오 모니터링; 기타
cs: Účel audiovýstupu: Zvuk v autě; Počítačový zvuk; Zvuk v domácnosti; Domácí kino; Venkovní použití; Systém PA; Přenosné audio; Profesionální zvuk; Chytrá domácnost; Studiový monitoring; Jiné
de: Audiozweck: Auto-Audio; Computer-Audio; Heim-Audio; Heimkino; Verwendung im Außenbereich; PA-System; Tragbares Audio; Professionelles Audio; Smart Home; Studio-Monitoring; Sonstiges
vi: Mục đích của âm thanh: Âm thanh xe hơi; Âm thanh máy tính; Âm thanh tại nhà; Rạp chiếu phim tại nhà; Sử dụng ngoài trời; Hệ thống PA; Âm thanh di động; Âm thanh chuyên nghiệp; Nhà thông minh; Loa kiểm âm; Khác
da: Lydformål: Lyd til bilen; Computerlyd; Lyd til hjemmet; Hjemmebiograf; Udendørs brug; PA-system; Bærbar lyd; Professionel lyd; Smart-home; Studieskærme; Andet
es: Uso del audio: Audio para automóviles; Audio para computadoras; Audio para el hogar; Cine en casa; Uso interior; Sistema de PA (Amplificación Pública); Audio portátil; Audio profesional; Hogar inteligente; Monitoreo de estudio; Otros
hu: Hang célja: Autós audiorendszer; Számítógépes audiorendszer; Otthoni audiorendszer; Házimozi; Kültéri használat; PA rendszer; Hordozható audiorendszer; Professzionális audiorendszer; Okosotthon; Stúdiófelügyelet; Egyéb